Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.340

Injunction.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule made pursuant to this chapter in a court of competent jurisdiction of the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur.

[ 1989 c 380 s 28; 1971 ex.s. c 190 s 34.]